src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Mohawk LANGUAGE.

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

first attempt to model simplest form of mohawk verbs:
personal prefix + root

we will start with only I, you and he 

https://giellalt.uit.no/lang/common/MorphologicalTags.html
extra tages are listed below

I-> X
you-> X
he -> X
she/smb/they -> X
it -> X
you and I -> X
smb and I -> X
you two -> X
two males or mixed -> X
two females -> X
you all and I -> X
they all and I -> X
you all
they all (male or mixed) -> X
they all (female) -> X
X -> I
X -> you
X -> he 
X -> she/smb/they 
X -> it 
X -> you and I
X -> smb and I 
X -> you two 
X -> two males or mixed 
X -> two females
X -> you all and I 
X -> they all and I 
X -> you all
X -> they all (male or mixed) 
X -> they all (female) 
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

marker of the start of the root stem
marker of the beginning of the personal prefix

type of personal pronouns used (red, blue purple)

Morphophonology
To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
symbols in the lexicon files:

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

The word forms in Mohawk language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-moh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>

---
